Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,133
Operator certification without examination; holder of certificate of competency.

The director shall provide for certification without examination of operators who, on August 30, 1987, hold certificates of competency issued pursuant to a program which the director determines meets the requirements of the Wastewater Treatment Operator Certification Act.

Laws 1987, LB 533, § 6.